Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1945YH (5) 91 dg/ko H.F. 410 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 1 UNHOUSED CHILD CARE REIMBURSEMENT RATES. The department of 2 health and human services shall amend the departmentâs rules 3 to set the reimbursement rate under the state child care 4 assistance program for providing child care to an unhoused 5 child equal to the reimbursement rate for providing child 6 care to a child needing special-needs care. For purposes of 7 this section, âunhousedâ means lacking a fixed, regular, and 8 adequate nighttime residence including but not limited to all 9 of the following: 10 1. A person living in the housing of other persons due to 11 the personâs loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar 12 reason. 13 2. A person living in a motel, hotel, or campground due to 14 the lack of a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. 15 3. A person living in an emergency or transitional shelter. 16 4. A person abandoned in a hospital. 17 5. A person living in a place not designed for, or 18 ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human 19 beings. 20 6. A person living in a car, park, public space, abandoned 21 building, substandard housing, bus or train station, or similar 22 setting. 23